dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="s/imma__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>immas</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>imma</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ummits</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immats</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ummit</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immat</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>imma</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ummet</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immat</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ummets</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immats</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ummen</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immad</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ummens</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immads</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umna</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immade</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umnas</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immades</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umne</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immade</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umnes</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immades</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umna</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immade</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umnas</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immades</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umna</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immade</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umnas</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immades</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ams</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immades</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>am</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immade</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ammes</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>amme</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immande</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immandes</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immas</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immar</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>immes</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>imme</l><r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="simma"><i>s</i><par n="s/imma__vblex"/></e>
